src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-6-tengkwe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20230507: Csilla)

  Verb - тэ̄ӈкве: # Verb 'to eat, to burn' - full paradigm
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Inf: тэ̄ӈкве
#Active, present tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: тэ̄гум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: тэ̄гын
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: тэ̄г
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: тэ̄гме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [тэ̄гын, тэ̄гы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: тэ̄гыг
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: [тэ̄гув, тэ̄гӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [тэ̄гын, тэ̄гы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: тэ̄гыт

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg: тэ̄глум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg: тэ̄глын
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg: тэ̄гтэ
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg: тэ̄глуме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg: [тэ̄глын, тэ̄глы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg: тэ̄гтэ̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg: [тэ̄глув, тэ̄глӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg: [тэ̄глын, тэ̄глы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg: тэ̄ганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu: тэ̄гагум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu: [тэ̄гагын, тэ̄гагн, тэ̄гагнын]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu: тэ̄гаге
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu: [тэ̄гагме̄н, тэ̄гагаме̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu: [тэ̄гагын, тэ̄гагы̄н, тэ̄гагагы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu: [тэ̄гаге̄н, тэ̄гагаге̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu: [тэ̄гагув, тэ̄гагӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu: [тэ̄гагын, тэ̄гагы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu: тэ̄гаганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl: тэ̄ганум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl: [тэ̄ганын, тэ̄ган]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl: тэ̄ганэ 
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl: [тэ̄ганаме̄н, тэ̄гананме̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl: [тэ̄ганын, тэ̄ганы̄н, тэ̄ган]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl: [тэ̄ганэ̄н, тэ̄гананэ̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl: [тэ̄ганув, тэ̄ганӯв, тэ̄гананув, тэ̄гананӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl: [тэ̄ганын, тэ̄ганы̄н, тэ̄ган]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl: тэ̄ганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: тэ̄сум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: [тэ̄сын, тэ̄сн, тэ̄снын]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: тэ̄с
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: тэ̄сме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [тэ̄сын, тэ̄сы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: [тэ̄сыг, тэ̄сы̄г]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [тэ̄сув, тэ̄сӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [тэ̄сын, тэ̄сы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: тэ̄сыт

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg: тэ̄слум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg: тэ̄слын
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg: тэ̄стэ
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg: тэ̄слуме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg: [тэ̄слын, тэ̄слы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg: тэ̄стэ̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg: [тэ̄слув, тэ̄слӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg: [тэ̄слын, тэ̄слы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg: тэ̄саныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcDu: тэ̄сагум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcDu: тэ̄сагын
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcDu: тэ̄саге
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu: тэ̄сагме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu: [тэ̄сагын, тэ̄сагы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu: тэ̄саге̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcDu: [тэ̄сагув, тэ̄сагӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu: [тэ̄сагын, тэ̄сагы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu: тэ̄саганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl: тэ̄санум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl: [тэ̄са̄нын, тэ̄сан]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl: тэ̄санэ
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcPl: [тэ̄санаме̄н, тэ̄санаме̄н, тэ̄санме̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcPl: [тэ̄санын, тэ̄саны̄н, тэ̄сан]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl: тэ̄санэ̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl: тэ̄санув
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl: [тэ̄санын, тэ̄саны̄н, тэ̄сан]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl: тэ̄саныл

#Active, conditional, subjective conjugation
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1: [тэ̄нувум, тэ̄нӯвум]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2: [тэ̄нувын, тэ̄нӯвын]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3: тэ̄нув
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1: тэ̄нуваме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2: [тэ̄нувын, тэ̄нувы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3: [тэ̄нувыг, тэ̄нувы̄г]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1: [тэ̄нувув, тэ̄нувӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2: [тэ̄нувын, тэ̄нувы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3: [тэ̄нувыт, тэ̄нувы̄т]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, single object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg: тэ̄нувлум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg: тэ̄нувлын
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg: тэ̄нувтэ
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcSg: тэ̄нувламе̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcSg: [тэ̄нувлын, тэ̄нувлы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcSg: тэ̄нувтэ̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg: [тэ̄нувлув, тэ̄нувлӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg: [тэ̄нувлын, тэ̄нувлы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg: [тэ̄нуваныл, тэ̄нува̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, dual object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcDu: [тэ̄нувагум, тэ̄нува̄гум]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcDu: [тэ̄нувагын, тэ̄нува̄гын]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcDu: [тэ̄нуваге, тэ̄нува̄ге]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcDu: тэ̄нувагме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcDu: [тэ̄нувагын, тэ̄нувагы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcDu: тэ̄нуваге̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcDu: [тэ̄нувагув, тэ̄нувагӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcDu: [тэ̄нувагын, тэ̄нувагы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcDu: [тэ̄нуваганыл, тэ̄нувага̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, plural object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl: [тэ̄нуванум, тэ̄нува̄нум]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl: [тэ̄нуванын, тэ̄нува̄нын]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl: [тэ̄нуванэ, тэ̄нува̄нэ]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcPl: тэ̄нуванме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcPl: [тэ̄нуванын, тэ̄нуваны̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcPl: тэ̄нуванэ̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl: тэ̄нуванув
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl: [тэ̄нуванын, тэ̄нуваны̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl: [тэ̄нуваныл, тэ̄нува̄ныл]

#Active, imperative, subjective conjugation
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2: та̄ен
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2: [та̄ен, та̄е̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2: [та̄ен, та̄е̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, single object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg: [та̄елн, та̄е̄лн]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg: [та̄е̄лн, та̄е̄лы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg: [та̄е̄лн, та̄е̄лы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, dual object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu: [та̄егын, та̄е̄гн]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu: [та̄егын, та̄егы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu: [та̄егын, та̄егы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, plural object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl: [та̄ен, та̄е̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl: [та̄ен, та̄е̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl: [та̄ен, та̄е̄н]

#Passive, present tense, indicative
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: тэ̄вем
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: тэ̄вен
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: тэ̄ве
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: тэ̄веме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [тэ̄вен, тэ̄ве̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: тэ̄ве̄г
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: тэ̄ве̄в
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [тэ̄вен, тэ̄ве̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: тэ̄вет

#Passive, past tense, indicative
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: та̄йве̄сум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: та̄йве̄сын
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [та̄йвес, та̄йве̄с]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: та̄йвесаме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [та̄йвесын, та̄йвесы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: та̄йвесы̄г
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [та̄йвесув, та̄йвесӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [та̄йвесын, та̄йвесы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: та̄йве̄сыт

#Passive, conditional
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg1: [тэ̄нувем, тэ̄нӯвем]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg2: [тэ̄нувен, тэ̄нӯвен]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg3: [тэ̄нуве, тэ̄нӯве]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu1: тэ̄нувеме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu2: [тэ̄нувен, тэ̄нуве̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu3: [тэ̄нувег, тэ̄нуве̄г]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl1: тэ̄нуве̄в
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl2: [тэ̄нувен, тэ̄нуве̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl3: [тэ̄нувет, тэ̄нӯвет]

#Passive, imperative conjugation
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Sg2: тэ̄гвен
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Du2: [тэ̄гвен, тэ̄гве̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Pl2: [тэ̄гвен, тэ̄гве̄н]

#Present participle
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc: тэ̄нэ
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1: тэ̄нэм
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2: тэ̄нэн
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3: тэ̄нэ̄тэ
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1: тэ̄нэме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2: тэ̄нэнэ̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3: [тэ̄нэг, тэ̄нэ̄г]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1: тэ̄нэ̄в
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2: [тэ̄нэн, тэ̄нэ̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3: [тэ̄нэныл, тэ̄нэ̄ныл]

#Present participle, single object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcSg: тэ̄нэ̄лум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcSg: [тэ̄нэ̄лн, тэ̄нэ̄лын]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcSg: тэ̄нэ̄тэ
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcSg: тэ̄нэламе̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcSg: тэ̄нэлы̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcSg: тэ̄нэтэ̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcSg: [тэ̄нэлув, тэ̄нэлӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcSg: тэ̄нэлы̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcSg: [тэ̄нӭнл, тэ̄нэ̄ныл]

#Present participle, dual object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcDu: тэ̄нэ̄гум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcDu: [тэ̄нэ̄гн, тӭнэ̄гын]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcDu: тэ̄нэ̄гэ
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcDu: тэ̄нэгаме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcDu: тэ̄нэгы̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcDu: тэ̄нэгэ̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcDu: [тэ̄нэгув, тэ̄нэгӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcDu: тэ̄нэгагы̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcDu: тэ̄нэгаганыл

#Present participle, plural object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcPl: тэ̄нэ̄нум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcPl: тэ̄нэ̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcPl: тэ̄нэ̄нэ
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcPl: [тэ̄нэнаме̄н, тэ̄нэнанме̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcPl: [тэ̄нэны̄н, тэ̄нэныны̄н, тэ̄нэнаны̄н] 
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcPl: [тэ̄нэнэ̄н, тэ̄нэнанэ̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcPl: [тэ̄нэнув, тэ̄нэнӯв, тэ̄нэнанув, тэ̄нэнанӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcPl: [тэ̄нэны̄н, тэ̄нэнаны̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcPl: [тэ̄нэ̄нл, тэ̄нэ̄наныл]

#Past participle
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc: тэ̄м
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1: тэ̄мум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2: тэ̄мын
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3: тэ̄ме
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1: тэ̄маме̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2: [тэ̄мын, тэ̄мы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3: тэ̄мыг
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1: [тэ̄мув, тэ̄мӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2: [тэ̄мын, тэ̄ммы̄н]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3: тэ̄мыт

#Past participle, single object
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcSg: тэ̄млум
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcSg: тэ̄млын
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcSg: тэ̄мтэ
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcSg: тэ̄мламе̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcSg: тэ̄млы̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcSg: тэ̄мтэ̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcSg: [тэ̄млув, тэ̄млӯв]
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcSg: тэ̄млы̄н
    тэ̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcSg: тэ̄маныл
